Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-209
Transportation of freight; regulation.

A city of the first class by ordinance may regulate the transportation of articles through the streets, and prevent injuries to the streets from overloaded vehicles.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XIII, p. 248;

R.S.1913, § 4825;

C.S.1922, § 3993;

C.S.1929, § 16-210;

R.S.1943, § 16-209.